Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 7
COUNTY SEATS DESIGNATED

Section

30-7-101. County seats designated.

The county seats of the several counties of the state of Colorado as heretofore established by statutes or statutory election proceedings are hereby confirmed, validated, and established from the date of such statutory enactment or proceeding as follows:

County

County Seat

Adams .................... Brighton

Alamosa .................... Alamosa

Arapahoe .................... Littleton

Archuleta .................... Pagosa Springs

Baca .................... Springfield

Bent .................... Las Animas

Boulder .................... Boulder

Broomfield, city and county of .................... Broomfield

Chaffee .................... Salida

Cheyenne .................... Cheyenne Wells

Clear Creek .................... Georgetown

Conejos .................... Conejos

Costilla .................... San Luis

Crowley .................... Ordway

Custer .................... Westcliffe

Delta .................... Delta

Denver, city and county of .................... Denver

Dolores .................... Dove Creek

Douglas .................... Castle Rock

Eagle .................... Eagle

Elbert .................... Kiowa

El Paso .................... Colorado Springs

Fremont .................... Cañon City

Garfield .................... Glenwood Springs

Gilpin .................... Central City

Grand .................... Hot Sulphur Springs

Gunnison .................... Gunnison

Hinsdale .................... Lake City

Huerfano .................... Walsenburg

Jackson .................... Walden

Jefferson .................... Golden

Kiowa .................... Eads

Kit Carson .................... Burlington

Lake .................... Leadville

La Plata .................... Durango

Larimer .................... Fort Collins

Las Animas .................... Trinidad

Lincoln .................... Hugo

Logan .................... Sterling

Mesa .................... Grand Junction

Mineral .................... Creede

Moffat .................... Craig

Montezuma .................... Cortez

Montrose .................... Montrose

Morgan .................... Fort Morgan

Otero .................... La Junta

Ouray .................... Ouray

Park .................... Fairplay

Phillips .................... Holyoke

Pitkin .................... Aspen

Prowers .................... Lamar

Pueblo .................... Pueblo

Rio Blanco .................... Meeker

Rio Grande .................... Del Norte

Routt .................... Steamboat Springs

Saguache .................... Saguache

San Juan .................... Silverton

San Miguel .................... Telluride

Sedgwick .................... Julesburg

Summit .................... Breckenridge

Teller .................... Cripple Creek

Washington .................... Akron

Weld .................... Greeley

Yuma .................... Wray

Source:

L. 55:

p. 244, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 34-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-4-1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 256, § 3, effective November 15.

30-7-102. Relocation not affected.

Nothing in this article shall affect the right of any county to change the location of its county seat as provided by law.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 244, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 34-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-4-2.